Montana, session 2025, LC0508.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 87-3-602, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-3-602. Training bird hunting dogs -- Class D-5 license -- rulemaking. (1) (a) Training of bird
hunting dogs using game birds not raised in captivity is allowed with the purchase of a Class D-5 license and
pursuant to the requirements of this part.
(b) A Class D-5 license is required for training bird hunting dogs using game birds not raised in
captivity. A person who is at least 18 years of age or older or who will turn 18 years of age during the season
for which the license is issued may purchase a license for a fee of $5 for residents and $10 for nonresidents.
The department may issue a free resident or nonresident Class D-5 license to a youth who is 12 to 18 years of
age.
(c) An applicant for a Class D-5 license shall report on the application the number of dogs to be
trained. The number of dogs must be printed on the license issued by the department.
(2) A Class D-5 license is not required for a person training bird hunting dogs with a method that
kills game birds raised in captivity. A person shall tag or mark the captive game bird prior to release. Captive
game birds must be obtained from a game bird farm licensed under 87-4-903 or from a source of game birds
approved by the department.
(3) A person who takes an untagged or unmarked game bird while training a bird hunting dog
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0508.1
outside of the established season for that species or who is not licensed to take that species shall immediately
report the taking to a representative of the department."
(4) The commission may make rules limiting the number of Class D-5 licenses issued under this
section.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****